Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5658.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-15 of the General Laws entitled "Passing, Use of Lanes, and Rules
of the Road" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-15-20.1 Lane splitting permitted.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any
motorcycle may be permitted to split lanes provided, that:
(1) Traffic is stopped or travelling at a speed of no greater than ten miles per hour (10 mph).
(2) The motorcycle operator does not exceed ten miles per hour (10 mph) above the rate of
speed of the current traffic flow.
(3) The motor cycle operator merges with traffic once the ten miles per hour (10 mph) lane
splitting restriction speed has been achieved by the flow of traffic.
(4) The posted speed limit on the highway being traveled is greater than fifty miles per
hour (50 mph).
(b) For the purposes of this section, "lane splitting" means driving a motorcycle, as defined
in § 31-1-3, that has two (2) wheels in contact with the ground, between rows of stopped or moving
vehicles in the same lane, including on both divided and undivided streets, roads, or highways.
(c) The administrator is hereby authorized to develop rules and regulations necessary to
carry out the purposes of this section, in consultation with the department of public safety.
(d) The provisions of this section authorizing lane splitting by motorcycles shall cease on

January 28, 2023.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall sunset on January 31, 2026.
========
LC002073
========
LC002073 - Page 2 of 3